Utah statutes.
11-25-3.   Definitions.
As used in this act:
(1)  "Bonds" mean any bonds, notes, interim certificates, debentures, or other
obligations issued by an agency pursuant to this part and which are payable
exclusively from the revenues, as defined in Subsection (9), and from any
other funds specified in this part upon which the bonds may be made a charge
and from which they are payable.
(2)  "Citizen participation" means action by the agency to provide persons who
will be affected by residential rehabilitation financed under the provisions
of this part with opportunities to be involved in planning and carrying out
the residential rehabilitation program.  "Citizen participation" shall
include, but not be limited to, all of the following:
(a)  Holding a public meeting prior to considering selection of the area for
designation.
(b)  Consultation with representatives of owners of property in, and residents
of, a residential rehabilitation area, in developing plans for public
improvements and implementation of the residential rehabilitation program.
(c)  Dissemination of information relating to the time and location of
meetings, boundaries of the proposed residential rehabilitation area, and a
general description of the proposed residential rehabilitation program.
Public meetings and consultations shall be conducted by an official designated
by the agency.  Public meetings shall be held at times and places convenient
to residents and property owners.
(3)  "Financing" means the lending of moneys or any other thing of value for
the purpose of residential rehabilitation.
(4)  "Agency" means a community development and renewal agency functioning
pursuant to Title 17C, Limited Purpose Local Government Entities - Community
Development and Renewal Agencies.
(5)  "Participating party" means any person, company, corporation,
partnership, firm, agency, political subdivision of the state, or other entity
or group of entities requiring financing for residential rehabilitation
pursuant to the provisions of this part.  No elective officer of the state or
any of its political subdivisions shall be eligible to be a participating
party under the provision of this part.
(6)  "Residential rehabilitation" means the construction, reconstruction,
renovation, replacement, extension, repair, betterment, equipping, developing,
embellishing, or otherwise improving residences consistent with standards of
strength, effectiveness, fire resistance, durability, and safety, so that the
structures are satisfactory and safe to occupy for residential purposes and
are not conducive to ill health, transmission of disease, infant mortality,
juvenile delinquency, or crime because of any one or more of the following
factors:
(a)  defective design and character of physical construction;
(b)  faulty interior arrangement and exterior spacing;
(c)  high density of population and overcrowding;
(d)  inadequate provision for ventilation, light, sanitation, open spaces, and
recreation facilities;
(e)  age, obsolescence, deterioration, dilapidation, mixed character, or
shifting of uses; and
(f)  economic dislocation, deterioration, or disuse, resulting from faulty
planning.
(7)  "Residence" means a residential structure in residential rehabilitation
areas.  It also means a commercial structure which, in the judgment of the
agency, is an integral part of a residential neighborhood.
(8)  "Rehabilitation standards" mean the applicable local or state standards
for the rehabilitation of buildings located in residential rehabilitation
areas, including any higher standards adopted by the agency as part of its
residential rehabilitation financing program.
(9)  "Revenues" mean all amounts received as repayment of principal, interest,
and all other charges received for, and all other income and receipts derived
by, the agency from the financing of residential rehabilitation, including
moneys deposited in a sinking, redemption, or reserve fund or other fund to
secure the bonds or to provide for the payment of the principal of, or
interest on, the bonds and such other moneys as the legislative body may, in
its discretion, make available therefor.
(10)  "Residential rehabilitation area" means the geographical area designated
by the agency as one for inclusion in a comprehensive residential
rehabilitation financing program pursuant to the provisions of this act.
